Connecticut, session 2026, SB00283.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 27-102a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of the general statutes with
respect to annual or biennial license or registration fees or occupational
taxes, any resident of Connecticut on active duty with the armed forces
of the United States shall be exempt from the payment of such fees or
taxes during [his] such resident's period of active service and for one
year following the date of [his] such resident's honorable discharge [or
the date of his] from, or of such resident's release under honorable
conditions [,] from, such service.
(b) Any member of the armed forces of any state or of any reserve
component of the armed forces of the United States who has been called
to active service in the armed forces of any state of the United States
shall be exempt from the payment of any fine or late fee assessed for
LCO No. 1681 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 283
failure to renew a motor vehicle operator's license or motor vehicle
registration or for failure to have emissions inspection performed in a
timely manner provided such member renews the license or registration
or has the member's vehicle inspected at an official emissions inspection
station no later than [sixty] ninety days following the date such member
is released from the qualifying military service.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 14-41 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) An original motor vehicle operator's license shall expire within
a period not exceeding seven years following the date of the operator's
next birthday. [The] Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the fee for such license shall be eighty-four dollars. Upon
renewal of a license, the commissioner may issue a license for a period
to be determined by the commissioner, provided such period does not
exceed eight years. The fee for the renewal of a license that expires eight
years from the date of issuance shall be ninety-six dollars. The
commissioner shall charge a prorated amount of such fee for a license
that expires less than eight years from the date of issuance.
(2) The commissioner shall waive the fee for an original motor vehicle
operator's license for any person who has been verified by the
Department of Veterans Affairs to be a veteran, as defined in section 14-
36h, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of section 14-
36h.
Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 1-1h of the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person who does not possess a valid motor vehicle operator's
license may apply to the Department of Motor Vehicles for an identity
card. The application for an identity card shall be accompanied by the
birth certificate of the applicant or a certificate of identification of the
applicant issued and authorized for such use by the Department of
LCO No. 1681 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 283
Correction and a fee of twenty-eight dollars. Such application shall
include: (1) The applicant's name; (2) the applicant's address; (3)
whether the address is permanent or temporary; (4) the applicant's date
of birth; (5) notice to the applicant that false statements on such
application are punishable under section 53a-157b; and (6) such other
pertinent information as the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles deems
necessary. The applicant shall sign the application in the presence of an
official of the Department of Motor Vehicles. The commissioner may
waive the fee for any applicant (A) who has voluntarily surrendered
such applicant's motor vehicle operator's license, (B) whose license has
been refused by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (4) of
subsection (e) of section 14-36, or (C) [who is both a veteran, as defined
in subsection (a) of section 27-103, and blind, as defined in subsection
(a) of section 1-1f, or (D)] who is a resident of a homeless shelter or other
facility for homeless persons or a certified homeless youth or certified
homeless young adult. The commissioner shall waive the fee for any
applicant who has been verified by the Department of Veterans Affairs
to be a veteran, as defined in section 14-36h, in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (e) of section 14-36h. The commissioner shall
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
establish the procedure and qualifications for the issuance of an identity
card to any such homeless applicant. For the purposes of this subsection,
"certified homeless youth" and "certified homeless young adult" have
the same meanings as provided in section 7-36.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 27-102a
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-41(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 1-1h(a)